Louisiana, session 2026, SB330.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:47(A)(4) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§47. Use of speed recording devices; restrictions
A. Automated speed enforcement devices or mobile speed cameras that are
used to issue a citation of an alleged violation by mail shall only be used by local
municipal authorities or local parish authorities in the following instances:
* * *
(4)(a) Upon the entrance to each school zone, there shall be painted a two-
foot-wide yellow stripe completely across the roadway with "Entering School Zone"
painted in twelve-inch white lettering visible therein. Upon entrance to any school
zone equipped with automated speed enforcement devices, the word
"SCHOOL" shall be proportionately striped across the lane adjacent to the
S1-1 school sign and the lettering shall be white in color in accordance with the
current edition of the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices. The word
"SCHOOL" shall not be required on nonasphaltic, nonconcrete roads, or any
roads determined unsuitable by the appropriate state agency.
(b) Pavement markings installed before August 1, 2026, on a roadway
not in the state highway system and in compliance with R.S. 32:47(A)(4) and (5)
as in effect before August 1, 2026, shall satisfy the pavement-marking
requirements of Subparagraph (4)(a) of this Subsection until the roadway is
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 330 ENROLLED
resurfaced or the markings are otherwise replaced.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 32:47(A)(5) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.